New York, session 2025-2026, A7059.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 2 of subsection (b) of section 9108 of the insur- 2 ance law is amended and a new subsection (f) is added to read as 3 follows: 4 (2) On or before the fifteenth day of February of each year, every 5 insurance company required to collect the fee imposed by this section 6 shall file with [said] the superintendent an annual statement in a 7 manner the superintendent shall prescribe, which statement shall show 8 the aggregate amount of gross premiums and premium deposits and assess- 9 ments collected during the immediately preceding year for insurance 10 against loss or injury and the several items of deduction referred to 11 under items (i) and (ii) of paragraph one of this subsection. 12 (f) Commencing April first, two thousand twenty-six, all such monies 13 received by the superintendent and paid into the code enforcement 14 account pursuant to this section shall be for the purpose of state aid 15 to localities for the enforcement of their relevant fire prevention and 16 building codes in accordance with section fifty-four-g of the state 17 finance law and any administrative expenses incurred by the secretary of 18 state pursuant to such programs. 19 § 2. Section 54-g of the state finance law, as added by chapter 707 of 20 the laws of 1981, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 609 of the laws of 21 1983, is amended to read as follows: 22 § 54-g. State assistance to local governments for support of activ- 23 ities related to fire prevention and building codes. 1. Beginning [in 24 March, nineteen hundred eighty-two] on April first, two thousand twen- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06915-01-5 A. 7059 2 1 ty-six and annually thereafter, the secretary of state shall grant each 2 county, city, village, and town [shall receive from moneys appropriated 3 by the state in] outside a village monies from the code enforcement 4 account as established in and pursuant to section ninety-one hundred 5 eight of the insurance law to support [of] activities related to the 6 administration and enforcement [in the previous calendar] year of their 7 respective fire prevention and building codes [the sum of] in the previ- 8 ous calendar year in the amounts computed in paragraphs a [and], b and c 9 below. 10 a. One-half the amount [appropriated] of monies in the code enforce- 11 ment account multiplied by the proportion which the [population of] 12 number of building permits issued by the county, city, village or town 13 outside a village bears to the [population of] number of such permits 14 issued in the state taken as a whole. 15 b. One-half the amount appropriated multiplied by the proportion which 16 [the full value of] the number of fire safety inspections conducted by 17 the county, city, village or town outside a village bears to the [full 18 value of] number of fire safety inspections conducted in the state 19 [taken as a whole]. The amount otherwise payable to a local government 20 under this subdivision shall be reduced by the amount of state aid to 21 local governments for housing maintenance code enforcement payable to 22 such local government in the same state fiscal year under the provisions 23 of section fifty-four-h of this [chapter] article. 24 c. Notwithstanding paragraphs a and b of this subdivision, no locality 25 shall receive an amount greater than twenty percent of the amount avail- 26 able in the code enforcement account per year. 27 2. In the instance where, pursuant to section three hundred eighty-one 28 of the New York state uniform fire prevention and building code act set 29 forth in article eighteen of the executive law, a county or the secre- 30 tary of state administers and enforces the New York state uniform fire 31 prevention and building code within a county, city, village or town, the 32 funds otherwise payable to the county, city, village, or town shall be 33 paid to the county or revert to the state, as the case may be. Where a 34 county or the secretary of state has been so engaged for less than the 35 entire calendar year provided in subdivision one, the moneys shall be 36 distributed to the city, village, or town, county or state in proportion 37 to the length of time for which each was responsible for said adminis- 38 tration and enforcement. 39 3. To receive funds from the code enforcement account pursuant to this 40 section, each county, city, village, or town outside a village shall 41 submit annually to the secretary of state an application with such 42 information as the secretary may require. The secretary shall prescribe 43 the time and manner of such application and make such information known 44 to the localities. Payouts to each qualifying county, city, village, or 45 town outside a village pursuant to this section shall be made no less 46 than quarterly. 47 4. The terms used in this section shall have the meanings ascribed to 48 them in section fifty-four of this article. 49 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.